District of Columbia statutes.
16-2311.01

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of section 16-2309(b) , section 16-2310.01 , section 16-2311(b)(1) , and section 16-2311.01 within 90 days from August 13, 1986. These rules shall be submitted for a 30-day period of review by the Council of the District of Columbia, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days that pass during Council recess.

History

Aug. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-140, § 2(e), 33 DCR 3827

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2311.1.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-140, see Mayor’s Order 86-192, October 27, 1986.

Editor's Notes

Section 28(c)(3) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-2311.1 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-2311.01.